incubator/apertium-rup/apertium-rup.rup.dix
    <pardef n="asc/apu__vblex">
	    <e><p><l>apu</l><r>apu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>âpamu</l><r>apu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>âpamu</l><r>apu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>âpai</l><r>apu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	
	    <e><p><l>âpatâ</l><r>apu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="asc/apitu__vblex">
	    <e><p><l>apitu</l><r>apitu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apitu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apitu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apitu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apitu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apitu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>âpitamu</l><r>apitu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apitu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apitu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>âpitamu</l><r>apitu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apitu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apitu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>âpitai</l><r>apitu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apitu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apitu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apitu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apitu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>apitu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	
	    <e><p><l>âpitatâ</l><r>apitu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="așt/eptu__vblex">
	    <e><p><l>eptu</l><r>eptu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eptu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eptu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eptu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eptu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eptu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>iptamu</l><r>eptu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eptu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eptu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>iptamu</l><r>eptu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eptu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eptu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>iptai</l><r>eptu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eptu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eptu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eptu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eptu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eptu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	
	    <e><p><l>iptatâ</l><r>eptu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ast/aľiu__vblex">
	    <e><p><l>aľiu</l><r>aľiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aľiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aľiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aľiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aľiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aľiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>âľiamu</l><r>aľiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aľiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aľiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>âľiamu</l><r>aľiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aľiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aľiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>âľiai</l><r>aľiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aľiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aľiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aľiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aľiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aľiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	
	    <e><p><l>âľiatâ</l><r>aľiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<e lm="asc"><i>apu</i><par n="asc/apu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="asc"><i>apitu</i><par n="asc/apitu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="asc"><i>apitu</i><par n="asc/apitu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="așt"><i>eptu</i><par n="așt/eptu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="ast"><i>aľiu</i><par n="ast/aľiu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="dișt"><i>eptu</i><par n="așt/eptu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="nc"><i>apu</i><par n="asc/apu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="nț"><i>apu</i><par n="asc/apu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="mp"><i>apu</i><par n="asc/apu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="s"><i>apu</i><par n="asc/apu__vblex"/></e>
